Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-307 Informal appointment
proceedings; delay in order; duty of registrar; effect of appointment.
(a) Upon receipt of an application for informal appointment of a personal
representative other than a special administrator as provided in section 560:3-614,
if at least one hundred twenty hours have elapsed since the decedent's death,
and after the registrar has made the findings required by section 560:3-308,
the registrar shall appoint the applicant subject to qualification and
acceptance; provided that if the decedent was a non-resident, the registrar
shall delay the appointment until thirty days have elapsed since death unless
the personal representative appointed at the decedent's domicile is the
applicant, or unless the decedent's will directs that the decedent's estate be
subject to the laws of this State.

(b) The status of personal representative and
the powers and duties pertaining to the office are fully established by
informal appointment. An appointment, and the office of personal representative
created thereby, is subject to termination as provided in sections 560:3-608 to
560:3-612, but is not subject to retroactive vacation. [L 1996, c 288, pt of
§1; am L 1997, c 244, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next